Wyoming, session 2026, HB0047.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 6-9-204 is created to read:

6-9-204. Duty to assist; failure to assist;
penalties.

(a) A person who knows or reasonably believes that
another person is suffering from an imminent risk of
HB0047

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0365
serious bodily injury or an imminent danger of death shall,
if the person is able, attempt to contact law enforcement
or an emergency medical care provider as defined by W.S.
19-13-202(a)(i) if doing so does not place the person or
the other person at risk of serious bodily injury or in
imminent danger of death. A person shall not be required to
attempt to contact law enforcement or an emergency medical
care provider under this subsection if the person knows or
reasonably believes that the other person does not require
help or emergency assistance.

(b) No person shall be liable under this section if:

(i) The person provides assistance to the other
person in accordance with W.S. 1-1-120; or

(ii) The person would incriminate himself by
providing information to law enforcement or an emergency
medical care provider in complying with subsection (a) of
this section.

HB0047

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0365
(c) A person who fails to assist as required under
subsection (a) of this section shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor punishable by:

(i) Imprisonment for not more than six (6)
months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars
($750.00), or both, if the failure to assist results in the
other person suffering serious bodily injury;

(ii) Imprisonment for not more than one (1)
year, a fine of not more than two thousand dollars
($2,000.00), or both, if the failure to assist results in
the death of the other person.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0047